Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 10. Alaska Capstone Avionics Revolving Loan Fund.

Sec. 44.33.650.
Declaration of policy.

History.

[Repealed, §§ 2, 5 ch 15 SLA 2008 ch 15 SLA 2008.]

Sec. 44.33.655.
Alaska capstone avionics revolving loan fund.

History.

[Repealed, §§ 2, 5 ch 15 SLA 2008 ch 15 SLA 2008.]

Sec. 44.33.660.
Powers and duties of the department.

History.

[Repealed, §§ 2, 5 ch 15 SLA 2008 ch 15 SLA 2008.]

Sec. 44.33.665.
Eligibility.

History.

[Repealed, §§ 2, 5 ch 15 SLA 2008 ch 15 SLA 2008.]

Sec. 44.33.670.
Limitations on loans.

History.

[Repealed, §§ 2, 5 ch 15 SLA 2008 ch 15 SLA 2008.]

Sec. 44.33.675.
Special account established.

History.

[Repealed, §§ 2, 5 ch 15 SLA 2008 ch 15 SLA 2008.]

Sec. 44.33.680.
Disposal of property acquired by default or foreclosure.

History.

[Repealed, §§ 2, 5 ch 15 SLA 2008 ch 15 SLA 2008.]

Sec. 44.33.690.
Definitions.

History.

[Repealed, §§ 2, 5 ch 15 SLA 2008 ch 15 SLA 2008.]